District of Columbia statutes.
24-924

Daily schedule.

The daily schedule at the BOOT CAMP shall include:

(1)

An early morning regimen of physical training, military style drilling, and cleaning of residence areas;

(2)

Education designed to result in the attainment of a General Equivalency Diploma (“GED”), which may utilize as academic teachers persons who have volunteered their services to the program and who satisfy the appropriate certification criteria;

(3)

Vocational training in an employment skill, including wood shop, electrical work, and plumbing, which may utilize as vocational teachers persons who have volunteered their services to the program and who satisfy the appropriate certification criteria;

(4)

Employment counseling and a full range of counseling, to include life skills training and stress and anger management;

(5)

Appropriate physical labor; and

(6)

Daily group meetings, substance abuse counseling, and organized physical recreation.

Jan. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-67, § 203, 40 DCR 5768
1981 Ed., § 24-824.